Georgia, session 2025_26, HB20.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
18 SECTION 1.
19 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Student Mental Health and Suicide
20 Prevention Act."
21 SECTION 2.
22 The General Assembly finds that:
23 (1) Depression is the most common mental health disorder among American teenagers and
24 adults. In 2021, over 5 million young people between the ages of 12 and 17 experienced
25 at least one major depressive episode in the prior year. Major depressive episodes are two
26 to three times more common in females than in males;
27 (2) Various biological, psychological, and environmental risk factors may contribute to
28 teenage depression, which can lead to substance and alcohol abuse, social isolation, poor
29 academic and workplace performance, unnecessary risk taking, early pregnancy, and
30 suicide, which is the third leading cause of death among teenagers. Approximately 20
31 percent of teenagers with depression seriously consider suicide and one in 12 attempt
32 suicide. Untreated teenage depression can also result in adverse consequences into and
33 throughout adulthood;
34 (3) Most teenagers who experience depression suffer from more than one episode. It is
35 estimated that although teenage depression is highly treatable through combinations of
36 therapy, individual and group counseling, and certain medications, fewer than one-third of
37 teenagers experiencing depression seek help or treatment; and
38 (4) The proper detection and diagnosis of depression is key in reducing the risk of teenage
39 suicide and improving physical and mental health outcomes for young people. It is
40 therefore fitting and appropriate to establish school based depression screenings to help
41 identify the symptoms of depression and facilitate access to appropriate treatment.
H. B. 20
- 2 -

25 LC 60 0032
42 SECTION 3.
43 Part 3 of Article 16 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
44 relating to the health of students generally, is amended by revising Code Section 20-2-779.1,
45 relating to suicide prevention and awareness training and no duty of care imposed, as
46 follows:
47 "20-2-779.1.
48 (a)(1) The Department State Board of Education shall adopt rules to require that all
49 certificated public school personnel receive annual training in depression and suicide
50 awareness and prevention. This training shall be provided within the framework of
51 existing in-service training programs offered and materials approved by the Department
52 of Education or as part of required professional development offered by a local school
53 system.
54 (2)(A) Subject to appropriations, the State Board of Education is authorized to
55 establish the Student Mental Health Screenings Grant Program. The purpose of such
56 grant program shall be to provide funding and resources to allow local school systems
57 to implement mental health screening programs in schools to identify students in grades
58 six through 12 who are at risk of depression and suicide.
59 (B) Awards under the grant program shall be allocated to local school systems in a
60 manner to be determined by the State Board of Education; provided, however, that the
61 State Board of Education shall, to the greatest extent possible, approve applications
62 from at least one local school system each in the northern, central, and southern regions
63 of the state and shall seek a cross section of local school systems from urban, suburban,
64 and rural areas of the state.
65 (2)(b)(1) The Department of Education shall, in consultation with the Department of
66 Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, the Suicide Prevention Program
67 established pursuant to Code Section 37-1-27, and depression and suicide prevention
68 experts, develop and approve a list of approved training materials to fulfill the
H. B. 20
- 3 -

25 LC 60 0032
69 requirements of this subsection which may include training materials currently being used
70 by a local school system, if such training materials meet any criteria established by the
71 Department of Education.
72 (3) Approved Such approved training materials shall include training on how to identify
73 appropriate mental health services, both within the school and also within the larger
74 community, and when and how to refer youth and their families to those services., and
75 (4) Approved materials may include programs that can be completed through self-review
76 of suitable depression and suicide awareness and prevention materials.
77 (2) To assist local school systems in developing their own policies for student depression
78 and suicide awareness and prevention, as required in subsection (c) of this Code section,
79 the Department of Education, in consultation with the Suicide Prevention Program within
80 the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, shall establish a
81 model policy for use by local school systems in accordance with this Code section.
82 (3)(A) To assist local school systems in selecting a research-based screening tool to use
83 as part of mental health screening programs, the Department of Education, in
84 consultation with the Suicide Prevention Program within the Department of Behavioral
85 Health and Developmental Disabilities, may develop a list of preapproved
86 research-based screening tools that are validated to screen depression and other mental
87 health risks in adolescents.
88 (B) No later than January 1, 2026, the Department of Education, in consultation with
89 the Suicide Prevention Program within the Department of Behavioral Health and
90 Developmental Disabilities, shall develop guidance and resources for local school
91 systems to facilitate the establishment of partnerships with organizations or healthcare
92 providers specializing in pediatric and adolescent mental health to conduct mental
93 health screenings.
94 (4)(A) As used in this paragraph, the term 'telehealth' means the use of information and
95 communications technologies, including, but not limited to, telephones, remote patient
H. B. 20
- 4 -

25 LC 60 0032
96 monitoring devices, and other electronic means, by a healthcare provider to facilitate
97 the delivery of long-distance healthcare services, including, but not limited to, patient
98 consultation, evaluation, diagnosis, treatment, education, and care management.
99 (B) The Department of Education, in consultation with the Suicide Prevention Program
100 within the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities and
101 appropriate stakeholders, including stakeholders with experience in, shall, on or before
102 October 1, 2025, develop guidance for the use of telehealth in public schools to provide
103 mental health and behavioral health services to students, including, but not limited to,
104 student mental health screenings at school or during any school related function.
105 Guidance developed pursuant to this subparagraph shall include, but shall not be limited
106 to, the following:
107 (i) Qualifications of individuals authorized, within the scope of their practice, to
108 assist students in accessing mental health and behavioral health services via telehealth
109 while such student is at school or during any school related function;
110 (ii) Qualifications of individuals authorized, within the scope of their practice, to
111 provide mental health and behavioral health services to students via telehealth;
112 (iii) The legal requirements for parental consent for the provision of mental health
113 and behavioral health services to a minor via telehealth while such minor is at school
114 or during any school related function;
115 (iv) Measures necessary to protect the security of data transmitted during the
116 provision of telehealth to students;
117 (v) Measures necessary to protect the privacy of student data pursuant to Article 15
118 of this chapter and the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act
119 (FERPA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1232g, and medical records pursuant to the federal
120 Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA), P.L. 104-191; and
121 (vi) Potential liability for public schools and local school systems associated with the
122 provision of telehealth to students.
H. B. 20
- 5 -

25 LC 60 0032
123 (5)(A)(c)(1) No later than December 31, 2025, each Each local school system shall adopt
124 a policy on student depression and suicide awareness and prevention. Such policies shall
125 be developed in consultation with school and community stakeholders, school-employed
126 mental health professionals, and suicide prevention experts, and shall, at a minimum,
127 address procedures relating to depression awareness and intervention and suicide
128 awareness, prevention, intervention, and postvention.
129 (B) To assist local school systems in developing their own policies for student suicide
130 prevention, the Department of Education, in consultation with the Suicide Prevention
131 Program within the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities,
132 shall establish a model policy for use by local school systems in accordance with this
133 Code section.
134 (2) A local school system seeking to participate and receive funding under the grant
135 program provided for in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall submit
136 an application to the State School Superintendent, in accordance with application
137 procedures and requirements prescribed by the State Board of Education. An application
138 submitted by a local school system shall include, at a minimum:
139 (A) A description of the mental health screening program to be implemented by the
140 local school system and an explanation of how the local school system will make
141 annual mental health screenings available to each student in grades six through 12;
142 (B) Details concerning the research based screening tool that will be used by the local
143 school system or whether the local school system will partner with an organization or
144 healthcare provider specializing in pediatric and adolescent mental health to conduct
145 the screenings;
146 (C) A request and justification for the amount of grant funding sought by the local
147 school system under the grant program;
H. B. 20
- 6 -

25 LC 60 0032
148 (D) A description of how the grant funding will be used to further the purposes of the
149 mental health screening program, including, but not limited to, hiring additional
150 personnel, purchasing materials, or contracting with outside entities;
151 (E) A description of how the mental health screenings will be conducted in a manner
152 that permits real-time evaluation of the screening results and same-day intervention by
153 a licensed mental health professional, if required based on the results of the screening;
154 (F) As applicable, the details of any partnership with an organization or provider
155 specializing in pediatric and adolescent mental health services, which shall include, but
156 shall not be limited to, the name of the organization or provider, the number of students
157 to be served by the organization or provider, the expected time frame to screen the
158 students, the costs associated with engaging in a partnership with the organization or
159 provider, and the location where the screenings will take place. A local school system
160 shall detail whether student health insurance information will be required under its
161 agreement with a partner organization or provider, how it will obtain that information,
162 and what accommodations will be made for uninsured or underinsured students and
163 uninsured and underinsured minor students whose parents or guardians have consented
164 to the screening;
165 (G) A description of how the local school system will ensure that the parent or
166 guardian of a student whose screening detects an irregularity is notified of such
167 irregularity and how the local school system will advise the parent or guardian of the
168 services available through a partner organization or provider or supply the parent or
169 guardian with resources to assist in acquiring further evaluation and diagnosis of the
170 student by a healthcare professional; and
171 (H) A description of how the local school system will obtain written informed consent
172 from a minor student's parent or guardian prior to the screening.
173 (3) A local school system that receives an award under the grant program provided for
174 in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall make available to each
H. B. 20
- 7 -

25 LC 60 0032
175 student in grades six through 12 an annual mental health screening which shall include
176 screening for depression and suicide risk. Each such local school system or public school
177 shall meet the following conditions when implementing its mental health screening
178 program:
179 (A) The local school system shall use a research based screening tool in its mental
180 health screening program conducted by a licensed mental health professional or through
181 a partnership with an organization or healthcare provider specializing in pediatric and
182 adolescent mental health to conduct the screenings. Nothing in this subparagraph shall
183 prohibit a local school system from using a self-administered screening tool as part of
184 the depression screening program;
185 (B) Mental health screenings shall be conducted in a manner that permits real-time
186 evaluation of the screening results and same day intervention by a licensed mental
187 health professional as indicated by the screening;
188 (C) The local school system shall ensure that mental health screenings are conducted
189 in a manner that accommodates students who are English language learners, students
190 with disabilities, and students with low reading proficiency when conducting the
191 screenings;
192 (D) Mental health screenings shall be conducted in a manner that ensures the privacy
193 of the student during the screening process and the confidentiality of the results,
194 consistent with state and federal laws applicable to the confidentiality of student records
195 and mental health records;
196 (E) The local school system shall obtain written informed consent from the minor
197 student's parent or guardian prior to such student's mental health screening; and
198 (F) The local school system shall forward data collected from the mental health
199 screenings to the Department of Education and to the Suicide Prevention Program
200 within the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities in a form
201 and manner to be determined by the Department of Education, provided that any data
H. B. 20
- 8 -

25 LC 60 0032
202 forwarded shall be aggregated and shall not contain any identifying or confidential
203 information with regard to any individual.
204 (4) In the event that a local school system chooses to partner with an organization or
205 healthcare provider specializing in pediatric and adolescent mental health to conduct the
206 mental health screenings, the partner organization or provider may also provide mental
207 health services as deemed necessary by the organization or provider and as consented to
208 by a minor student's parent or guardian. A local school system partnering with an
209 organization or healthcare provider specializing in pediatric and adolescent mental health
210 may develop a form to obtain parental consent and student health insurance information
211 as necessary to satisfy the provisions of any partnership agreement.
212 (b)(d) No person shall have a cause of action for any loss or damage caused by any act or
213 omission resulting from the implementation of the provisions of this Code section or
214 arising from any advice, screening, facilitation of screening, or training, or lack thereof,
215 required by provided pursuant to this Code section.
216 (c)(e) Any advice, screenings, facilitation of screenings, and The training, or lack thereof,
217 required by the provisions of provided for in this Code section shall not be construed to
218 impose any specific duty of care.
219 (f) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to affect a local school system's ability
220 to provide additional or supplemental services to a student as required by, or as consistent
221 with, any applicable provision of state or federal law."
222 SECTION 4.
223 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 20
- 9 -